Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 42

Ancillary Administration

28-42-101. General law to apply.

Except when special provision is made otherwise, the law and procedure relating to the administration of estates of resident decedents shall apply to the ancillary administration of estates of nonresident decedents.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 187; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3109.

28-42-102. Application for ancillary letters.

A foreign personal representative, upon the filing of an authenticated copy of his or her domiciliary letters with the circuit court of the county of proper venue, may be issued letters in this state, notwithstanding that the personal representative is a nonresident of this state.

A corporate foreign personal representative need not otherwise qualify as a corporation to do business under the general corporation laws of this state to authorize it to act as ancillary personal representative in the particular estate if it complies with the provisions of §§ 28-42-104 and 28-42-105.

Upon application by a foreign personal representative for the issuance of ancillary letters, preference shall be given to such an applicant, unless the court finds that the appointment will not be for the best interest of the estate. If the court so finds, the court may order the issuance of ancillary letters to any person eligible under the provisions of § 28-48-101.

An interested person may apply for issuance of ancillary letters to a qualified person other than the foreign personal representative. In that event, the applicant, in the manner directed or approved by the court, shall give notice of the application to the foreign personal representative, if the foreign personal representative's name and address are known, and to the court which appointed him or her, if the court is known. If, at the time of filing the application, the name and address of the foreign representative or the court which appointed him or her are not known, the notice shall be given as soon thereafter, either before or after the issuance of letters, as the facts pertaining thereto become known.

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

The refusal of a court to appoint a Texas domiciliary administrator as ancillary administrator was not an abuse of discretion where all of the assets of the estate, with the exception of an apparent small amount of personal property in Texas, were located in Arkansas, and that property would likely have to be sold for the payment of debts. Phillips v. Sherrod Estate, 248 Ark. 605, 453 S.W.2d 60 (1970).

Evidence that the bulk of decedent's property was located in Perry County, Arkansas, which would probably have to be sold to pay decedent's debts, and that the creditors of decedent lived in Perry County was sufficient to sustain a finding by the probate court that it was not in the best interest of the estate to appoint a Texas administrator located two hundred miles away in Texarkana as ancillary administrator. Phillips v. Sherrod Estate, 248 Ark. 605, 453 S.W.2d 60 (1970).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 179; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3101.

28-42-103. Ancillary personal representative — Bond.

An ancillary personal representative shall give bond as required by §28-48-201. However, if he or she is a resident of this state, the bond may be reduced or dispensed with in accordance with §28-48-206.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 180; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3102.

28-42-104. Designation of agent.

Prior to the granting of ancillary letters to a nonresident, the nonresident ancillary personal representative shall comply with the provisions of §28-48-101(b)(6) concerning designation of an agent to accept service of process.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 181; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3103.

28-42-105. Substitution of foreign for local representative.

If any other person has been appointed local personal representative, the foreign personal representative, not later than twenty (20) days after the dispatch of notice to him or her under § 28-42-102, unless this period is extended for cause by the court, may apply for revocation of the appointment and for granting of ancillary letters to himself or herself.

Notice of the hearing on the application shall be given to the local personal representative.

Upon the finding that the action is for the best interest of the estate, the court may revoke the letters of the local personal representative and grant the application of the foreign personal representative.

After the application is granted, the local personal representative shall deliver to the foreign personal representative all assets and records of the estate in his or her possession and shall account to the foreign personal representative and to the court.

The hearing on the account may be held immediately, or upon such notice as the court may direct.

Upon compliance with the court's direction, the local personal representative and his or her sureties shall be discharged.

Upon qualification, the foreign personal representative shall be substituted in all actions and proceedings brought by or against the local personal representative in his or her representative capacity and shall be entitled to all the rights and be subject to all the burden arising out of the uncompleted administration in all respects as if it had been continued by the local personal representative.

If the local personal representative has served or has been served with any process or notice, no further service or notice shall be necessary, nor shall the time within which any steps may or must be taken be changed, unless the court in which the action or proceedings are pending so orders.

The granting of the petition shall not terminate the ancillary administration.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 182; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3104.

28-42-106. Removal of assets to domiciliary jurisdiction.

Petition.Prior to the final disposition of the ancillary estate under §28-42-109 and upon giving such notice as the court may direct, the foreign personal representative may apply for leave to remove all or any part of the assets from this state to the domiciliary jurisdiction for the purpose of administration and distribution.

(b)

Order.

Before granting the petition, the court shall inquire into the sufficiency of the bond given pursuant to the provisions of §28-42-103 and shall direct the furnishing of an additional bond if required for the protection of the estate or interested persons.

The court, in its discretion, may grant, deny, or postpone action on the petition.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 183; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3105.

28-42-107. Payment of claims generally.

An ancillary personal representative may pay a claim against the estate only if it has been presented and allowed in the manner and within the time required to establish a claim against an estate of domiciliary administration in this state.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 184; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3106.

Cross References. Claims against estates, §28-50-101 et seq.

28-42-108. Payment of claims — Insolvent estates.

(a)

Equality Subject to Preferences and Security.

If the estate, either in this state or as a whole, is insolvent, it shall be disposed of so that, as far as possible, each creditor whose claim has been allowed, either in this state or elsewhere, shall receive an equal proportion of his or her claim, subject to preferences and priorities and to any security which a creditor has as to particular assets.

If a preference or priority is allowed in another jurisdiction but not in this state, the creditor so benefited shall receive dividends from local assets only upon the balance of his or her claim after deducting the amount of the benefit.

The validity and effect of any security held in this state shall be determined by the law of this state, but a secured creditor who has not released or surrendered his or her security shall be entitled only to a proportion computed upon the balance due after the value of all security not exempt from the claims of unsecured creditors is determined and credited upon the claim secured by it.

Where the Arkansas trial court made no finding regarding the solvency of the decedent's estate, it was improper for the trial court to grant summary judgment on the Tennessee creditors'claims against the estate. In accordance with this section, it was necessary to determine whether the estate was solvent before determining whether certain creditors'claims would be allowed.Ellingsen v. King, 2009 Ark. App. 655 (2009).

(b)

Procedure.

In case of insolvency and if local assets permit, each claim allowed in this state shall be paid its proportion, and any balance of assets shall be disposed of in accordance with §28-42-109.

If local assets are not sufficient to pay all claims allowed in this state the full amount to which they are entitled under this section, local assets shall be marshaled so that each claim allowed in this state shall be paid its proportion as far as possible, after taking into account all dividends on claims allowed in this state from assets in other jurisdictions.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 185; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3107.